src/linux/hunspell_en_ru_dict/ru_RU.aff
SFX 75 Y 30
SFX 75   ьня  ен           ьня
SFX 75   ька  ек           ька
SFX 75   я    ь            [аеиояуы]ня
SFX 75   я    й            [еиу]я
SFX 75   я    и            я
SFX 75   я    ей           я
SFX 75   я    ею           я
SFX 75   я    е            [^и]я
SFX 75   я    ю            я
SFX 75   ня   ен           [^аеийояуьыз]ня
SFX 75   ка   ок           [^юацеийояужьышч]ка
SFX 75   ка   к            [юаеиояуы]ка
SFX 75   ка   ек           [цжшч]ка
SFX 75   йня  ен           йня
SFX 75   йка  ек           йка
SFX 75   а    ы            [^гхкжшщч]а
SFX 75   а    у            а
SFX 75   а    ой           [^цжшщч]а
SFX 75   а    ою           [^цжшщч]а
SFX 75   а    и            [гхкжшщч]а
SFX 75   а    ей           [цшщч]а
SFX 75   а    ею           [цшщч]а
SFX 75   а    е            а
SFX 75   а    0            [^к]а
SFX 75   0    ми           я
SFX 75   0    ми           а
SFX 75   0    м            я
SFX 75   0    м            а
SFX 75   0    х            я
SFX 75   0    х            а

SFX 76 Y 30
SFX 76 а ы [^гжкхчшщ]а
SFX 76 а и [гжкхчшщ]а
SFX 76 а е а
SFX 76 а у а
SFX 76 а ой [^жцчшщ]а
SFX 76 а ою [^жцчшщ]а
SFX 76 а ей [цчшщ]а
SFX 76 а ею [цчшщ]а
SFX 76 а 0 [^к]а
SFX 76 ка ок [^аежийоуцчшьыюя]ка
SFX 76 ка к [аеиоуыюя]ка
SFX 76 ка ек [жцчш]ка
SFX 76 йка ек йка
SFX 76 ька ек ька
SFX 76 0 м а
SFX 76 0 ми а
SFX 76 0 х а
SFX 76 я и я
SFX 76 я е [^и]я
SFX 76 я ю я
SFX 76 я ей я
SFX 76 я ею я
SFX 76 я й [еиу]я
SFX 76 ня ен [^аезийоуыья]ня
SFX 76 я ь [аеиоуыя]ня
SFX 76 йня ен йня
SFX 76 ьня ен ьня
SFX 76 0 м я
SFX 76 0 ми я
SFX 76 0 х я

SFX 77 Y 25
SFX 77 e ings [^eioy]e
SFX 77 0 ings [eoy]e
SFX 77 ie yings ie
SFX 77 0 bings [^aeio][aeiou]b
SFX 77 0 king [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX 77 0 dings [^aeio][aeiou]d
SFX 77 0 fings [^aeio][aeiou]f
SFX 77 0 gings [^aeio][aeiou]g
SFX 77 0 kings [^aeio][aeiou]k
SFX 77 0 lings [^aeio][eiou]l
SFX 77 0 ings [aeio][eiou]l
SFX 77 0 lings [^aeo]al
SFX 77 0 ings [aeo]al
SFX 77 0 mings [^aeio][aeiou]m
SFX 77 0 nings [^aeio][aiou]n
SFX 77 0 pings [^aeio][aeiou]p
SFX 77 0 rings [^aeio][aiou]r
SFX 77 0 sings [^aeio][aeiou]s
SFX 77 0 tings [^aeio][aiou]t
SFX 77 0 vings [^aeio][aeiou]v
SFX 77 0 zings [^aeio][aeiou]z
SFX 77 0 ings [^aeio]e[nrt]
SFX 77 0 ings [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgkmnprstvz]
SFX 77 0 ings [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX 77 0 ings [^ebcdfgklmnprstvz]

SFX 78 Y 2
SFX 78   e     ings       e
SFX 78   0     ings       [^e]

SFX 79 Y 23
SFX 79 0 а [^ейоь]
SFX 79 0 у [^ейоь]
SFX 79 0 ом [^ежйоцчшщь]
SFX 79 0 е [^ейоь]
SFX 79 й я й
SFX 79 й ю й
SFX 79 й ем й
SFX 79 й е [^и]й
SFX 79 й и ий
SFX 79 ь я ь
SFX 79 ь ю ь
SFX 79 ь ем ь
SFX 79 ь е ь
SFX 79 е я [^жцшщ]е
SFX 79 е а [жцшщ]е
SFX 79 е ю [^жцшщ]е
SFX 79 е у [жцшщ]е
SFX 79 0 м е
SFX 79 е и ие
SFX 79 о а о
SFX 79 о у о
SFX 79 0 м о
SFX 79 о е о

SFX 80 Y 37
SFX 80   ь    я            ь
SFX 80   ь    ем           ь
SFX 80   ь    е            ь
SFX 80   ь    ю            ь
SFX 80   о    у            о
SFX 80   о    е            о
SFX 80   о    а            о
SFX 80   й    я            й
SFX 80   й    и            ий
SFX 80   й    ем           й
SFX 80   й    е            [^и]й
SFX 80   й    ю            й
SFX 80   е    у            [цжшщ]е
SFX 80   е    я            [^цжшщ]е
SFX 80   е    и            ие
SFX 80   е    а            [цжшщ]е
SFX 80   е    ю            [^цжшщ]е
SFX 80   ёж   ежу          ёж
SFX 80   ёж   еже          ёж
SFX 80   ёж   ежа          ёж
SFX 80   ё    я            ё
SFX 80   ё    е            ьё
SFX 80   ё    ю            ё
SFX 80   0    у            [^ейоь]
SFX 80   0    у            [^ёейожь]
SFX 80   0    у            [^ё]ж
SFX 80   0    ом           [^цейожьшщч]
SFX 80   0    ом           [^ёцейожьшщч]
SFX 80   0    м            о
SFX 80   0    м            е
SFX 80   0    м            [ёе]
SFX 80   0    е            [^ейоь]
SFX 80   0    е            [^ёейожь]
SFX 80   0    е            [^ё]ж
SFX 80   0    а            [^ейоь]
SFX 80   0    а            [^ёейожь]
SFX 80   0    а            [^ё]ж

SFX 81 Y 32
SFX 81 0 а [^еёжйоь]
SFX 81 0 а [^ё]ж
SFX 81 ёж ежа ёж
SFX 81 0 у [^еёжйоь]
SFX 81 0 у [^ё]ж
SFX 81 ёж ежу ёж
SFX 81 0 ом [^еёжйоцчшщь]
SFX 81 0 е [^еёжйоь]
SFX 81 0 е [^ё]ж
SFX 81 ёж еже ёж
SFX 81 й я й
SFX 81 й ю й
SFX 81 й ем й
SFX 81 й е [^и]й
SFX 81 й и ий
SFX 81 ь я ь
SFX 81 ь ю ь
SFX 81 ь ем ь
SFX 81 ь е ь
SFX 81 е я [^жцшщ]е
SFX 81 ё я ё
SFX 81 е а [жцшщ]е
SFX 81 е ю [^жцшщ]е
SFX 81 ё ю ё
SFX 81 е у [жцшщ]е
SFX 81 0 м [её]
SFX 81 е и ие
SFX 81 ё е ьё
SFX 81 о а о
SFX 81 о у о
SFX 81 0 м о
SFX 81 о е о

SFX 82 Y 55
SFX 82 0 а [^ейоь]
SFX 82 0 у [^ейоь]
SFX 82 0 ом [^ежйоцчшщь]
SFX 82 0 е [^ейоь]
SFX 82 0 ы [^гежйкохчшщь]
SFX 82 0 и [гжкхчшщ]
SFX 82 0 ей [жчшщ]
SFX 82 0 ов [^ежйоцчшщь]
SFX 82 0 ам [^ейоь]
SFX 82 0 ами [^ейоь]
SFX 82 0 ах [^ейоь]
SFX 82 й я й
SFX 82 й ю й
SFX 82 й ем й
SFX 82 й е [^и]й
SFX 82 й и ий
SFX 82 й и [аеоуюя]й
SFX 82 й ев й
SFX 82 й ям й
SFX 82 й ями й
SFX 82 й ях й
SFX 82 ь я ь
SFX 82 ь ю ь
SFX 82 ь ем ь
SFX 82 ь е ь
SFX 82 ь и ь
SFX 82 ь ей ь
SFX 82 ь ям ь
SFX 82 ь ями ь
SFX 82 ь ях ь
SFX 82 е я [^жцшщ]е
SFX 82 е а [жцшщ]е
SFX 82 е ю [^жцшщ]е
SFX 82 е у [жцшщ]е
SFX 82 0 м е
SFX 82 е и ие
SFX 82 е ей [^жицщь]е
SFX 82 ще щ ще
SFX 82 е й ие
SFX 82 ье ий ье
SFX 82 е ям [^жцшщ]е
SFX 82 е ам [жцшщ]е
SFX 82 е ями [^жцшщ]е
SFX 82 е ами [жцшщ]е
SFX 82 е ях [^жцшщ]е
SFX 82 е ах [жцшщ]е
SFX 82 о а о
SFX 82 о у о
SFX 82 0 м о
SFX 82 о е о
SFX 82 о и [ичш]ко
SFX 82 о 0 [вгдст]о
SFX 82 о ам о
SFX 82 о ами о
SFX 82 о ах о

SFX 83 Y 55
SFX 83   ще   щ            ще
SFX 83   ье   ий           ье
SFX 83   ь    ями          ь
SFX 83   ь    ям           ь
SFX 83   ь    ях           ь
SFX 83   ь    я            ь
SFX 83   ь    и            ь
SFX 83   ь    ем           ь
SFX 83   ь    ей           ь
SFX 83   ь    е            ь
SFX 83   ь    ю            ь
SFX 83   о    у            о
SFX 83   о    и            [ишч]ко
SFX 83   о    е            о
SFX 83   о    ами          о
SFX 83   о    ам           о
SFX 83   о    ах           о
SFX 83   о    а            о
SFX 83   о    0            [дгств]о
SFX 83   й    ями          й
SFX 83   й    ям           й
SFX 83   й    ях           й
SFX 83   й    я            й
SFX 83   й    и            ий
SFX 83   й    и            [юаеояу]й
SFX 83   й    ев           й
SFX 83   й    ем           й
SFX 83   й    е            [^и]й
SFX 83   й    ю            й
SFX 83   е    у            [цжшщ]е
SFX 83   е    ями          [^цжшщ]е
SFX 83   е    ям           [^цжшщ]е
SFX 83   е    ях           [^цжшщ]е
SFX 83   е    я            [^цжшщ]е
SFX 83   е    й            ие
SFX 83   е    и            ие
SFX 83   е    ей           [^цижьщ]е
SFX 83   е    ами          [цжшщ]е
SFX 83   е    ам           [цжшщ]е
SFX 83   е    ах           [цжшщ]е
SFX 83   е    а            [цжшщ]е
SFX 83   е    ю            [^цжшщ]е
SFX 83   0    ы            [^егхйкожьшщч]
SFX 83   0    у            [^ейоь]
SFX 83   0    ов           [^цейожьшщч]
SFX 83   0    ом           [^цейожьшщч]
SFX 83   0    м            о
SFX 83   0    м            е
SFX 83   0    и            [гхкжшщч]
SFX 83   0    ей           [жшщч]
SFX 83   0    е            [^ейоь]
SFX 83   0    ами          [^ейоь]
SFX 83   0    ам           [^ейоь]
SFX 83   0    ах           [^ейоь]
SFX 83   0    а            [^ейоь]

SFX 84 Y 55
SFX 84 0 а [^ейоь]
SFX 84 0 у [^ейоь]
SFX 84 0 ом [^ежйоцчшщь]
SFX 84 0 е [^ейоь]
SFX 84 0 ы [^гежйкохчшщь]
SFX 84 0 и [гжкхчшщ]
SFX 84 0 ей [жчшщ]
SFX 84 0 ов [^ежйоцчшщь]
SFX 84 0 ам [^ейоь]
SFX 84 0 ами [^ейоь]
SFX 84 0 ах [^ейоь]
SFX 84 й я й
SFX 84 й ю й
SFX 84 й ем й
SFX 84 й е [^и]й
SFX 84 й и ий
SFX 84 й и [аеоуюя]й
SFX 84 й ев й
SFX 84 й ям й
SFX 84 й ями й
SFX 84 й ях й
SFX 84 ь я ь
SFX 84 ь ю ь
SFX 84 ь ем ь
SFX 84 ь е ь
SFX 84 ь и ь
SFX 84 ь ей ь
SFX 84 ь ям ь
SFX 84 ь ями ь
SFX 84 ь ях ь
SFX 84 е я [^жцшщ]е
SFX 84 е а [жцшщ]е
SFX 84 е ю [^жцшщ]е
SFX 84 е у [жцшщ]е
SFX 84 0 м е
SFX 84 е и ие
SFX 84 е ей [^жицщь]е
SFX 84 ще щ ще
SFX 84 е й ие
SFX 84 ье ий ье
SFX 84 е ям [^жцшщ]е
SFX 84 е ам [жцшщ]е
SFX 84 е ями [^жцшщ]е
SFX 84 е ами [жцшщ]е
SFX 84 е ях [^жцшщ]е
SFX 84 е ах [жцшщ]е
SFX 84 о а о
SFX 84 о у о
SFX 84 0 м о
SFX 84 о е о
SFX 84 о и [ичш]ко
SFX 84 о 0 [вгдст]о
SFX 84 о ам о
SFX 84 о ами о
SFX 84 о ах о

SFX 85 Y 12
SFX 85 0 ament m
SFX 85 y iment [^aeiou]y
SFX 85 0 ment [aeiou]y
SFX 85 0 ment [^my]
SFX 85 0 aments m
SFX 85 y iments [^aeiou]y
SFX 85 0 ments [aeiou]y
SFX 85 0 ments [^my]
SFX 85 0 ament's m
SFX 85 y iment's [^aeiou]y
SFX 85 0 ment's [aeiou]y
SFX 85 0 ment's [^my]

SFX 86 Y 1
SFX 86   0     ment       .

SFX 87 Y 52
SFX 87 ть л [^зс]ть
SFX 87 ть ла [^с]ть
SFX 87 ть ло [^с]ть
SFX 87 ть ли [^с]ть
SFX 87 ться лся [^зс]ться
SFX 87 ться лась [^с]ться
SFX 87 ться лось [^с]ться
SFX 87 ться лись [^с]ться
SFX 87 сть л [^ч].сть
SFX 87 есть ел честь
SFX 87 сть ла [^ч].сть
SFX 87 есть ла честь
SFX 87 сть ло [^ч].сть
SFX 87 есть ло честь
SFX 87 сть ли [^ч].сть
SFX 87 есть ли честь
SFX 87 сться лся сться
SFX 87 сться лась сться
SFX 87 сться лось сться
SFX 87 сться лись сться
SFX 87 сти л сти
SFX 87 сти ла сти
SFX 87 сти ло сти
SFX 87 сти ли сти
SFX 87 стись лся стись
SFX 87 стись лась стись
SFX 87 стись лось стись
SFX 87 стись лись стись
SFX 87 зти з зти
SFX 87 ти ла зти
SFX 87 ти ли зти
SFX 87 ти ло зти
SFX 87 зть з зть
SFX 87 ться ся зться
SFX 87 чь к чь
SFX 87 чь кла чь
SFX 87 чь кло чь
SFX 87 чь кли чь
SFX 87 чься кся чься
SFX 87 чься клась чься
SFX 87 чься клось чься
SFX 87 чься клись чься
SFX 87 0 ла [^аиья]
SFX 87 0 ло [^аиья]
SFX 87 0 ли [^аиья]
SFX 87 ся лась [^аиья]ся
SFX 87 ся лось [^аиья]ся
SFX 87 ся лись [^аиья]ся
SFX 87 а о а
SFX 87 а и а
SFX 87 ась ось ась
SFX 87 ась ись ась

SFX 88 Y 63
SFX 88   чься кся          чься
SFX 88   чься кся          [^е]чься
SFX 88   чься клось        чься
SFX 88   чься клись        чься
SFX 88   чься клась        чься
SFX 88   чь   кло          чь
SFX 88   чь   кли          чь
SFX 88   чь   кла          чь
SFX 88   чь   к            чь
SFX 88   чь   к            [^е]чь
SFX 88   зть  з            зть
SFX 88   зти  з            зти
SFX 88   ться ся           зться
SFX 88   ться лся          [^сз]ться
SFX 88   ться лось         [^с]ться
SFX 88   ться лись         [^с]ться
SFX 88   ться лась         [^с]ться
SFX 88   ть   ло           [^с]ть
SFX 88   ть   ли           [^с]ть
SFX 88   ть   ла           [^с]ть
SFX 88   ть   л            [^сз]ть
SFX 88   ти   ло           зти
SFX 88   ти   ли           зти
SFX 88   ти   ла           зти
SFX 88   сться лся          сться
SFX 88   сться лось         сться
SFX 88   сться лись         сться
SFX 88   сться лась         сться
SFX 88   сть  ло           [^ч].сть
SFX 88   сть  ли           [^ч].сть
SFX 88   сть  ла           [^ч].сть
SFX 88   сть  л            [^ч].сть
SFX 88   стись лся          стись
SFX 88   стись лся          [^е]стись
SFX 88   стись лось         стись
SFX 88   стись лись         стись
SFX 88   стись лась         стись
SFX 88   сти  ло           сти
SFX 88   сти  ли           сти
SFX 88   сти  ла           сти
SFX 88   сти  л            сти
SFX 88   сти  л            [^е]сти
SFX 88   ся   лось         [^аияь]ся
SFX 88   ся   лись         [^аияь]ся
SFX 88   ся   лась         [^аияь]ся
SFX 88   лзти лз           лзти
SFX 88   ечься ёкся         ечься
SFX 88   ечь  ёк           ечь
SFX 88   езти ёз           езти
SFX 88   есть ло           честь
SFX 88   есть ли           честь
SFX 88   есть ла           честь
SFX 88   есть ел           честь
SFX 88   есть ёл           честь
SFX 88   естись ёлся         естись
SFX 88   ести ёл           ести
SFX 88   ась  ось          ась
SFX 88   ась  ись          ась
SFX 88   а    о            а
SFX 88   а    и            а
SFX 88   0    ло           [^аияь]
SFX 88   0    ли           [^аияь]
SFX 88   0    ла           [^аияь]
